North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-03 Licenses and Permits

20.1-03-01.
General penalty.

Any person violating a provision of this chapter for which a penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1975, ch. 106, § 199.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Applicability of state fishing license laws or other public regulations to fishing in private lake or pond, 15 A.L.R.2d 754.

Entrapment with respect to violation of fishing laws, 75 A.L.R.2d 709.

20.1-03-01.1.
Director to appoint and train instructors — Prescribe course material and classroom sites — Certify completion.

The director shall provide classroom instruction on, and shall select, train, and certify persons or department personnel qualified to provide instruction on, firearms and bow safety and hunter responsibility, and shall prescribe the course material to be used, classroom locations, and the dates for teaching the course in this state. The director also shall provide an online internet hunter safety education program for individuals age sixteen and over to complete the hunter safety education requirement. The director shall authorize the issuance of a certificate of completion to all persons satisfactorily completing the course.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 206, § 1; 1983, ch. 268, § 1; 1987, ch. 274, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 33; 2009, ch. 204, § 1.

20.1-03-01.2.
Instruction required before issuance of hunting license — Age limits — Penalty.

No person born after December 31, 1961, except as provided in section 20.1-03-01.3, may be issued any hunting license in this state unless that person submits or exhibits the certificate of completion earned by that person for successful completion of the course of instruction required by sections 20.1-03-01.1 through 20.1-03-01.3 or the person submits or exhibits a prior North Dakota hunting license issued to that person with that person’s hunter education certificate number on the license. A certificate of completion issued by any other state or province of Canada is valid for all purposes. Any person who purchases a hunting license without successfully completing the course of instruction required by sections 20.1-03-01.1 through 20.1-03-01.3 is guilty of a class 2 noncriminal offense.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 206, § 2; 1985, ch. 272, § 9; 1995, ch. 227, § 1.

20.1-03-01.3.
Exemptions.

Sections 20.1-03-01.1 through 20.1-03-01.3 do not apply to:

Persons under twelve years of age who hunt only with their parent or legal guardian.

Persons who hunt exclusively on land of which they are the record title owner or operator.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 206, § 3; 1987, ch. 274, § 2.

20.1-03-01.4.
Additional education requirement for bowhunters — Standards — Penalty. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 1993, ch. 228, § 2.

20.1-03-01.5.
Apprentice hunter validation.

An individual born after December 31, 1961, who is twelve years of age or older, and who does not possess a hunter safety education course certificate of completion may be issued an apprentice hunter validation. Except as provided in subsection 2, an apprentice hunter validation is valid for only one license year in a lifetime. An individual in possession of an apprentice hunter validation may hunt small game and deer only when accompanied by an adult licensed to hunt in this state whose license was not obtained using an apprentice hunter validation. An apprentice hunter validation holder must obtain all required licenses and stamps. For purposes of this section, “accompanied” means to stay within a distance of another individual that permits uninterrupted visual contact in unaided verbal communication.

An individual who was issued an apprentice hunter validation for the 2020-21 license year may receive another apprentice hunter validation for one additional license year in the individual’s lifetime.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 3; 2017, ch. 172, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 185, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

20.1-03-02.
General game license — Stamps allowed for specific licenses.

Except as provided in section 20.1-03-07.3, a person may not:

Acquire any resident or nonresident license to hunt, catch, take, or kill any small game or big game animal unless that person first obtains an annual general game license.

Hunt, catch, take, trap, or kill any small game or big game animal unless that person has in that person’s possession an annual general game license together with the specific license required.

The director shall design and furnish, for sale to residents and nonresidents, an annual general game license. A stamp may be prepared by the director to be affixed to a general game license in place of each separate small game or big game hunting license.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 34; 1999, ch. 218, § 1.

20.1-03-03.
Licenses to hunt, trap, or fish required of residents.

No resident of this state, except as provided in section 20.1-03-04, may:

Hunt, catch, take, or kill any small game without having a resident small game license.

Trap, catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill any protected fur-bearing animal without having a resident fur-bearer license.

Catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill any fish without having a resident fishing license.

Hunt, catch, take, or kill any big game animal without having the respective resident big game license.

Each violation of this section constitutes a distinct and separate offense.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10.

Cross-References.

Fees for licenses and permits, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-12.

Residence, rules for determining, see N.D.C.C. § 54-01-26.

Resident defined, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-02.

Suspension of hunting or fishing privileges, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-26.

20.1-03-03.1.
General game license not required for hunting on Indian land.

An individual hunting on Indian land pursuant to a tribal hunting license is not required to possess a state license to hunt on such land.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 204, § 2.

20.1-03-04.
When licenses to hunt, fish, or trap not required of residents.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Subject to the provisions of this title:

Any resident, or any member of the resident’s family residing customarily with the resident, may hunt small game, fish, or trap during the open season without a license upon land owned or leased by the resident.

Residents or nonresidents under the age of sixteen years may fish without a fishing license.

Residents may fish at a private fish hatchery without a resident fishing license.

Life skills and transition center patients, North Dakota youth correctional center students, school for the deaf students, North Dakota vision services — school for the blind students, state hospital patients, clients of regional human service centers under direct therapeutic care, and residents of facilities licensed by the state department of health and the department of human services may fish without a resident fishing license. Patients of these institutions must be identified. The department shall issue authority to each institution.

Residents may fish without a resident fishing license on free fishing days. The date of these free fishing days may be set by proclamation by the governor.

Residents under age sixteen may take fur-bearers without a fur-bearer license.

Residents under age sixteen may take small game or waterfowl without a small game license.

Residents who are enrolled as students or serving as certified instructors during official aquatics education program events of the game and fish department may be granted free fishing privileges by discretion of the director.

Upon presentation of valid leave papers and a valid North Dakota operator’s license, a resident who is on leave and is on active duty as a member of the United States armed forces or the United States merchant marine may hunt small game, fish, or trap during the open season without a license.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1973, ch. 207, § 1; 1975, ch. 208, § 1; 1975, ch. 209, § 1; 1983, ch. 269, § 1; 1989, ch. 280, § 1; 1993, ch. 229, § 1; 1993, ch. 230, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 1995, ch. 120, § 25; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 51, § 12; 2001, ch. 257, § 6; 2007, ch. 217, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 5; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

Cross-References.

Fishing license not required at private fish hatchery, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-06-12.

20.1-03-04.
When licenses to hunt, fish, or trap not required of residents. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Subject to the provisions of this title:

Any resident, or any member of the resident’s family residing customarily with the resident, may hunt small game, fish, or trap during the open season without a license upon land owned or leased by the resident.

Residents or nonresidents under the age of sixteen years may fish without a fishing license.

Residents may fish at a private fish hatchery without a resident fishing license.

Life skills and transition center patients, North Dakota youth correctional center students, school for the deaf students, North Dakota vision services — school for the blind students, state hospital patients, clients of regional human service centers under direct therapeutic care, and residents of facilities licensed by the department of health and human services may fish without a resident fishing license. Patients of these institutions must be identified. The department shall issue authority to each institution.

Residents may fish without a resident fishing license on free fishing days. The date of these free fishing days may be set by proclamation by the governor.

Residents under age sixteen may take fur-bearers without a fur-bearer license.

Residents under age sixteen may take small game or waterfowl without a small game license.

Residents who are enrolled as students or serving as certified instructors during official aquatics education program events of the game and fish department may be granted free fishing privileges by discretion of the director.

Upon presentation of valid leave papers and a valid North Dakota operator’s license, a resident who is on leave and is on active duty as a member of the United States armed forces or the United States merchant marine may hunt small game, fish, or trap during the open season without a license.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1973, ch. 207, § 1; 1975, ch. 208, § 1; 1975, ch. 209, § 1; 1983, ch. 269, § 1; 1989, ch. 280, § 1; 1993, ch. 229, § 1; 1993, ch. 230, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 1995, ch. 120, § 25; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 51, § 12; 2001, ch. 257, § 6; 2007, ch. 217, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 5; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 100, effective September 1, 2022.

20.1-03-04.1.
When license to take frogs not required of residents.

Subject to the provisions of this title:

Any resident, or any member of the resident’s family residing customarily with the resident, may take frogs for sale during the open season without a license upon land owned or leased by the resident for agricultural purposes.

Residents under the age of fifteen may take frogs without a resident frog license.

Any person may take and possess a maximum of twenty-four frogs without a frog license if that person has a fishing license or is otherwise legally entitled to fish in the state.

Any licensed bait vendor may take, buy, sell, or ship within the state frogs for angling purposes without a frog license.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 1.

20.1-03-05.
Application for resident general game, fur-bearer, or fishing license — Contents.

Each application for a resident general game, fur-bearer, or fishing license must be signed by the applicant and must state:

That the applicant has been a bona fide state resident for at least six months.

The applicant’s residential address, including street and post office.

The applicant’s weight, height, color of hair, and color of eyes.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10.

Cross-References.

Residence, rules for determining, see N.D.C.C. § 54-01-26.

Resident defined, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-02.

20.1-03-06.
Contents of resident general game, fur-bearer, or fishing licenses — Licenses not transferable — Resident family fishing license.

A resident general game, fur-bearer, or fishing license is not transferable. Each such license shall:

Describe the licensee.

Designate the licensee’s place of residence.

Have printed upon it in large figures the year for which it is issued, or if it is a fur-bearer license, the statement that it expires on the first day of September following the date of issue.

Have printed upon it in large letters the word “nontransferable”.

Be issued in the name of the director.

In addition to the regular resident fishing license, there is hereby authorized a resident family fishing license allowing the husband and wife of a family to fish under one license. Such license shall be valid for the same period as other resident fishing licenses and shall be issued in duplicate. The husband and wife are each to have a copy in possession while fishing.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 35.

20.1-03-07.
Licenses to hunt, trap, or fish required of nonresidents.

Nonresidents, except as provided in sections 20.1-02-05, 20.1-03-07.3, and 20.1-03-08, may not:

Hunt, catch, take, or kill any small game without a nonresident small game license. The nonresident small game license entitles the nonresident to hunt small game for any period of fourteen consecutive days or any two periods of seven consecutive days each. The hunting period for which the license is valid must be designated on the license. A nonresident small game license is not required to hunt waterfowl under section 20.1-03-07.1 or wild turkeys under section 20.1-04-07. A nonresident may purchase more than one nonresident small game license per year.

Trap, catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill any protected fur-bearing animal, except that nonresidents holding a valid nonresident fur-bearer and nongame hunting license may hunt only fox and coyote and except that residents of a state that allows North Dakota residents to trap within that state may purchase a nonresident reciprocal trapping license to trap in this state. However, a nonresident holding a valid nonresident reciprocal trapping license may not trap, catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill bobcats.

Catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill any fish without having a nonresident fishing license.

Hunt, catch, take, or kill any unprotected bird or animal without having a nonresident nongame hunting license or nonresident fur-bearer and nongame hunting license.

Hunt, catch, take, or kill any big game animal without having the respective nonresident big game license.

Each violation of this section is a distinct and separate offense.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1977, ch. 207, § 1; 1989, ch. 281, § 1; 1995, ch. 228, § 1; 1999, ch. 218, § 2; 2003, ch. 197, § 2; 2005, ch. 214, § 1; 2005, ch. 222, § 1.

Cross-References.

Fees for licenses and permits, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-12.

Residence, rules for determining, see N.D.C.C. § 54-01-26.

Resident defined, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-02.

Suspension of hunting or fishing privileges, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-26.

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Prohibiting, Limiting, or Regulating Fishing or Hunting in State by Nonresidents, 31 A.L.R.6th 523.

20.1-03-07.1.
Nonresident waterfowl hunting license required.

Except as provided in sections 20.1-02-05, 20.1-03-07.2, and 20.1-03-07.3, a nonresident may not hunt waterfowl unless that individual first obtains a nonresident waterfowl hunting license. However, a nonresident may hunt cranes after first obtaining a nonresident waterfowl hunting license or a nonresident small game hunting license.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the nonresident waterfowl hunting license entitles the nonresident to hunt waterfowl for any period of fourteen consecutive days or any two periods of seven consecutive days each. A license authorizing the fourteen-day hunting period allows hunting in a specified waterfowl hunting zone. A license authorizing two 7-day hunting periods allows hunting in a specified zone during each period.

Upon payment of the fee for a statewide nonresident waterfowl hunting license, a nonresident may hunt waterfowl in any zone. Forty dollars of the fee for a statewide nonresident waterfowl license must be used for the private land open to sportsmen program.

The governor, in the governor’s proclamation, shall specify various waterfowl hunting zones for which nonresident waterfowl hunting licenses will be available, and may specify the number of licenses which may be issued in each zone and the manner in which they are to be issued.

A nonresident is entitled to purchase only one nonresident waterfowl hunting license per year.

The fourteen-day and two 7-day hunting period restrictions do not apply to nonresidents hunting during the early Canada goose season.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 210, § 1; 1979, ch. 303, § 1; 1981, ch. 259, § 1; 1995, ch. 229, § 1; 1999, ch. 218, § 3; 1999, ch. 219, § 1; 2003, ch. 195, § 2; 2003, ch. 197, § 3; 2003, ch. 198, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 3; 2005, ch. 215, § 1; 2005, ch. 216, § 1; 2007, ch. 57, § 1; 2007, ch. 218, § 1; 2011, ch. 174, § 1; 2013, ch. 193, § 2.

20.1-03-07.2.
Nonresident youth hunting licenses.

A nonresident youth who is less than sixteen years of age may purchase a resident small game hunting license and may hunt small game and waterfowl except swans and wild turkeys; provided, that the nonresident youth’s state, or province or territory of Canada, of residence provides a reciprocal licensing agreement for North Dakota residents who are less than sixteen years of age. To be eligible to purchase a license under this section, a nonresident youth may not have arrived at the age of sixteen before September first of the year for which the license is issued and must possess a certificate of completion for a certified hunter education course. The nonresident youth may only hunt under the supervision of an adult family member or legal guardian who is licensed to hunt small game or waterfowl in this state and is subject to the same regulations as that youth’s adult family member or legal guardian. This section does not apply to the hunting of big game or to a license issued by lottery.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 229, § 2.

20.1-03-07.3.
Nonresident spring white goose license.

A nonresident may purchase a nonresident spring white goose license to hunt white geese during a spring season as determined by the governor by proclamation. The governor, in the governor’s proclamation, may specify the number of licenses that may be issued and the manner in which they are to be issued. Nonresidents are not required to purchase any other license to hunt white geese during a spring white goose season. A nonresident is entitled to purchase only one nonresident spring white goose license per year; however, a nonresident may still purchase a nonresident waterfowl hunting license under section 20.1-03-07.1.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 218, § 4.

20.1-03-08.
When licenses to fish not required of nonresident.

Subject to other provisions of this title, any nonresident under the age of sixteen years may fish without a nonresident fishing license if accompanied by an adult possessing a valid fishing license. Any nonresident may fish in the waters of a private fish hatchery without a nonresident fishing license. Nonresidents approved by the department and serving as instructors at official aquatics education events may fish without a license at the discretion of the director.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1989, ch. 282, § 1; 1993, ch. 230, § 2.

Cross-References.

Fishing license not required at private fish hatchery, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-06-12.

20.1-03-09.
Application for nonresident general game or fishing license — Contents.

Each application for a nonresident general game or fishing license must be signed by the applicant and state the applicant’s residential address, including street and post office, and the applicant’s weight, height, color of hair, and color of eyes.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10, 1977, ch. 207, § 2.

20.1-03-10.
Contents of nonresident general game, fishing, or reciprocal trapping licenses — Licenses not transferable — Nonresident short-term fishing license.

A nonresident general game, fishing, or reciprocal trapping license is not transferable. Each license must:

Describe the licensee.

Designate the licensee’s place of residence.

Have printed upon it in large figures the year for which it is issued.

Have printed upon it in large letters the words “nonresident license” and “nontransferable”.

Have connected to it detachable shipping tags as the director may deem advisable.

Be issued in the name of the director.

In addition to the regular nonresident fishing license, nonresident short-term fishing licenses may be issued. These licenses are valid up to ten days from the date of issue.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1977, ch. 207, § 3; 1977, ch. 208, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 36; 1995, ch. 228, § 2; 2005, ch. 217, § 1.

20.1-03-10.1.
Trout and salmon license stamp. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 231, § 2.